Utah statutes.
48-3a-205.   Filing requirements.

(1)  To be filed by the division pursuant to this chapter, a record must be received by the division, comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

(a)  The filing of the record must be required or permitted by this chapter.

(b)  The record must be physically delivered in written form unless and to the extent the division permits electronic delivery of records.

(c)  The words in the record must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals.

(d)  The record must be signed by a person authorized or required under this chapter to sign the record.

(e)  The record must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who signed it, either on behalf of the individual or the person authorized or required to sign the record, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

(2)  If law other than this chapter prohibits the disclosure by the division of information contained in a record delivered to the division for filing, the division shall accept the record if the record otherwise complies with this chapter, but the division may redact the information.

(3)  When a record is delivered to the division for filing, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the division or by that law.

(4)  The division may require that a record delivered in written form be accompanied by an identical or conformed copy.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

